Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1748YH (5) 91 jm/jh H.F. 360 Section 1. Section 422.7, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 45. Subtract, to the extent included, the 3 portion of compensation that is earned for a workweek that 4 exceeds forty hours and is compensated at a rate not less than 5 one and one-half times but not exceeding twice the regular rate 6 at which the person is employed, as authorized by 29 U.S.C. 7 Â§207. 8 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to tax years 9 beginning on or after January 1, 2026. 10